Massachusetts, session 194th, S395.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION I. – The Massachusetts General Laws are hereby amended by inserting the
following new chapter:
Comprehensive Study of Athletic Performance Surfaces –
Including Artificial Grass – & Turf Surfaces Act
An Act to Further Research And Report Analysis of Athletic Performance Surfaces
Their Safety – And Recommendations
SECTION II. – PURPOSE
There shall be established a: Comprehensive Athletic Surface Performance Commission
(CASPC). Significant Public Health concerns, have grown regarding the use of artificial grass,
of 3

and various artificial turf surfaces, in schools, athletic facilities, parks, and other locations across
The Commonwealth of Massachusetts, and cautionary information, suggests that such use should
be limited, and/or ceased. Important analysis, and research on this set of issues, is needed, before
further potentially negligent, and wasteful public expenditure, is carried out.
This Special Commission, shall conduct comprehensive research relating to studying
athletic performance surfaces – including artificial grass – and turf surfaces; and shall provide a
detailed, factual analysis of all such surfaces, their costs, their public health effects, and their
long-term values.
SECTION III. – MEMBERSHIP
This Special Commission, shall consist of fifteen (15) members, who shall include: Three
(3) scientific members, including at least one (1) researcher, designated by the PFAS Lab, at the
Social Science Health Research Institute at Northeastern University; one (1) representative of the
Secretary of the Executive Office of Energy and Environmental Affairs; one (1) representative of
outdoor high school sports coaches; one (1) representative of outdoor college sports coaches; one
(1) sports medicine medical doctor professional; three (3) representatives of established
environmental organizations; and five (5) members of the general public, at least one (1) of
whom will be a parent of an outdoor sport student.
Once the Special Commission is appointed, and convened, they shall select one (1)
member, as Chair. They shall conduct such inquiry as further described, and produce a report, no
more than 24 months after beginning operations.
SECTION IV. – ADMINISTRATIVE LOCATIONS – AND OPERATIONS
of 3

The Secretary of the Executive Office of Energy and Environmental Affairs, shall
designate, a representative designee, to be a member of the Special Commission; as noted above,
and provide such resources, experts, and facilitation, as needed.
The Commission, shall conduct a series of hearings, across The Commonwealth of
Massachusetts, inviting a wide range of public comment, and asking detailed scientific, and
medical questions, and information.
of 3